Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2172 N 1
SFX 2172 0 TauZ .

SFX 2173 N 1
SFX 2173 0 tBeige .

SFX 2174 N 1
SFX 2174 0 tBlue .

SFX 2175 N 1
SFX 2175 0 tBrown .

SFX 2176 N 1
SFX 2176 0 tCadmiumRed .

SFX 2177 N 1
SFX 2177 0 tCadmiumYellow .

SFX 2178 N 1
SFX 2178 0 tCoral .

SFX 2179 N 1
SFX 2179 0 tCyan .

SFX 2180 N 1
SFX 2180 0 tedModel .

SFX 2181 N 1
SFX 2181 0 Tee .

SFX 2182 N 1
SFX 2182 0 TeeArrow .

SFX 2183 N 1
SFX 2183 0 TeeVector .

SFX 2184 N 1
SFX 2184 0 Template .

SFX 2185 N 1
SFX 2185 0 temporal .

SFX 2186 N 1
SFX 2186 0 Temporary .

SFX 2187 N 1
SFX 2187 0 ten .

SFX 2188 N 1
SFX 2188 0 tenAt .

SFX 2189 N 1
SFX 2189 0 tenLayer .

SFX 2190 N 1
SFX 2190 0 ter .

SFX 2191 N 1
SFX 2191 0 teradian .

SFX 2192 N 1
SFX 2192 0 teradians .

SFX 2193 N 1
SFX 2193 0 tère .

SFX 2194 N 1
SFX 2194 0 tères .

SFX 2195 N 1
SFX 2195 0 Term .

SFX 2196 N 1
SFX 2196 0 Terms .

SFX 2197 N 1
SFX 2197 0 tesla .

SFX 2198 N 1
SFX 2198 0 teslas .

SFX 2199 N 1
SFX 2199 0 Test .

SFX 2200 N 1
SFX 2200 0 TetrodeConstant .

SFX 2201 N 1
SFX 2201 0 Text .

SFX 2202 N 1
SFX 2202 0 tExternalSession .

SFX 2203 N 1
SFX 2203 0 TextFormat .

SFX 2204 N 1
SFX 2204 0 TextFormatType .

SFX 2205 N 1
SFX 2205 0 TextInlineFormatType .

SFX 2206 N 1
SFX 2206 0 TextPacket .

SFX 2207 N 1
SFX 2207 0 TextualAnswer .

SFX 2208 N 1
SFX 2208 0 tGoldenrod .

SFX 2209 N 1
SFX 2209 0 tGray .

SFX 2210 N 1
SFX 2210 0 tGreen .

SFX 2211 N 1
SFX 2211 0 th .

SFX 2212 N 1
SFX 2212 0 Than .

SFX 2213 N 1
SFX 2213 0 Theme .

SFX 2214 N 1
SFX 2214 0 Theorem .

SFX 2215 N 1
SFX 2215 0 Theta .

SFX 2216 N 1
SFX 2216 0 ThetaC .

SFX 2217 N 1
SFX 2217 0 ThetaD .

SFX 2218 N 1
SFX 2218 0 ThetaN .

SFX 2219 N 1
SFX 2219 0 ThetaS .

SFX 2220 N 1
SFX 2220 0 Thread .

SFX 2221 N 1
SFX 2221 0 Threshold .

SFX 2222 N 1
SFX 2222 0 Through .

SFX 2223 N 1
SFX 2223 0 ti .

SFX 2224 N 1
SFX 2224 0 tic .

SFX 2225 N 1
SFX 2225 0 tick .

SFX 2226 N 1
SFX 2226 0 Ticks .

SFX 2227 N 1
SFX 2227 0 TicksFormat .

SFX 2228 N 1
SFX 2228 0 TicksStyle .

SFX 2229 N 1
SFX 2229 0 tigm .

SFX 2230 N 1
SFX 2230 0 Tilde .

SFX 2231 N 1
SFX 2231 0 tile .

SFX 2232 N 1
SFX 2232 0 Time .

SFX 2233 N 1
SFX 2233 0 TimeFourier .

SFX 2234 N 1
SFX 2234 0 TimeFourierData .

SFX 2235 N 1
SFX 2235 0 Times .

SFX 2236 N 1
SFX 2236 0 TimeSeries .

SFX 2237 N 1
SFX 2237 0 TimesLayer .

SFX 2238 N 1
SFX 2238 0 TimeZone .

SFX 2239 N 1
SFX 2239 0 Timing .

SFX 2240 N 1
SFX 2240 0 ting .

SFX 2241 N 1
SFX 2241 0 tingAngle .

SFX 2242 N 1
SFX 2242 0 tingParameters .

SFX 2243 N 1
SFX 2243 0 tingPolynomial .

SFX 2244 N 1
SFX 2244 0 tingStepSize .

SFX 2245 N 1
SFX 2245 0 tix .

SFX 2246 N 1
SFX 2246 0 To .

SFX 2247 N 1
SFX 2247 0 ToBoxFormPacket .

SFX 2248 N 1
SFX 2248 0 ToByteArray .

SFX 2249 N 1
SFX 2249 0 ToField .

SFX 2250 N 1
SFX 2250 0 ToFilename .

SFX 2251 N 1
SFX 2251 0 ToFileName .

SFX 2252 N 1
SFX 2252 0 ToFitPage .

SFX 2253 N 1
SFX 2253 0 tOfLine .

SFX 2254 N 1
SFX 2254 0 tOfString .

SFX 2255 N 1
SFX 2255 0 Together .

SFX 2256 N 1
SFX 2256 0 TogetherArray .

SFX 2257 N 1
SFX 2257 0 ToInputForm .

SFX 2258 N 1
SFX 2258 0 tokes .

SFX 2259 N 1
SFX 2259 0 toleic .

SFX 2260 N 1
SFX 2260 0 Ton .

SFX 2261 N 1
SFX 2261 0 TooltipStyle .

SFX 2262 N 1
SFX 2262 0 tooth .

SFX 2263 N 1
SFX 2263 0 ToOutputForm .

SFX 2264 N 1
SFX 2264 0 ToPolynomial .

SFX 2265 N 1
SFX 2265 0 TopWindow .

SFX 2266 N 1
SFX 2266 0 ToStandardForm .

SFX 2267 N 1
SFX 2267 0 ToStream .

SFX 2268 N 1
SFX 2268 0 touw .

SFX 2269 N 1
SFX 2269 0 tProcess .

SFX 2270 N 1
SFX 2270 0 Trace .

SFX 2271 N 1
SFX 2271 0 TraceTest .

SFX 2272 N 1
SFX 2272 0 Tracking .

SFX 2273 N 1
SFX 2273 0 TradingChart .

SFX 2274 N 1
SFX 2274 0 Transform .

SFX 2275 N 1
SFX 2275 0 TransformedRegion .

SFX 2276 N 1
SFX 2276 0 TransientRepeat .

SFX 2277 N 1
SFX 2277 0 Translation .

SFX 2278 N 1
SFX 2278 0 Transpose .

SFX 2279 N 1
SFX 2279 0 Tree .

SFX 2280 N 1
SFX 2280 0 Triangle .

SFX 2281 N 1
SFX 2281 0 TriangleBar .

SFX 2282 N 1
SFX 2282 0 TriangleEqual .

SFX 2283 N 1
SFX 2283 0 Trim .

SFX 2284 N 1
SFX 2284 0 Truncate .

SFX 2285 N 1
SFX 2285 0 tScheduledTask .

SFX 2286 N 1
SFX 2286 0 TSquareDistribution .

SFX 2287 N 1
SFX 2287 0 tt .

SFX 2288 N 1
SFX 2288 0 tti .

SFX 2289 N 1
SFX 2289 0 TukeyTest .

SFX 2290 N 1
SFX 2290 0 Turquoise .

SFX 2291 N 1
SFX 2291 0 Type .

SFX 2292 N 1
SFX 2292 0 TypeAutoConvert .

SFX 2293 N 1
SFX 2293 0 TypeName .

SFX 2294 N 1
SFX 2294 0 tz .

SFX 2295 N 1
SFX 2295 0 U .

SFX 2296 N 1
SFX 2296 0 uantize .

SFX 2297 N 1
SFX 2297 0 uchi .

SFX 2298 N 1
SFX 2298 0 UhlenbeckProcess .

SFX 2299 N 1
SFX 2299 0 ula .

SFX 2300 N 1
SFX 2300 0 ultiplied .

SFX 2301 N 1
SFX 2301 0 Umber .

SFX 2302 N 1
SFX 2302 0 Union .

SFX 2303 N 1
SFX 2303 0 Unit .

SFX 2304 N 1
SFX 2304 0 UnitStep .

SFX 2305 N 1
SFX 2305 0 Unload .

SFX 2306 N 1
SFX 2306 0 Unregister .

SFX 2307 N 1
SFX 2307 0 uotient .

SFX 2308 N 1
SFX 2308 0 uotientRemainder .

SFX 2309 N 1
SFX 2309 0 UpArrow .

SFX 2310 N 1
SFX 2310 0 Update .

SFX 2311 N 1
SFX 2311 0 Updating .

SFX 2312 N 1
SFX 2312 0 UpDownVector .

SFX 2313 N 1
SFX 2313 0 UpTeeVector .

SFX 2314 N 1
SFX 2314 0 UpVector .

SFX 2315 N 1
SFX 2315 0 UpVectorBar .

SFX 2316 N 1
SFX 2316 0 urable .

SFX 2317 N 1
SFX 2317 0 urie .

SFX 2318 N 1
SFX 2318 0 uries .

SFX 2319 N 1
SFX 2319 0 URLType .

SFX 2320 N 1
SFX 2320 0 us .

SFX 2321 N 1
SFX 2321 0 Users .

SFX 2322 N 1
SFX 2322 0 ushev .

SFX 2323 N 1
SFX 2323 0 UUID .

SFX 2324 N 1
SFX 2324 0 Value .

SFX 2325 N 1
SFX 2325 0 ValuePattern .

SFX 2326 N 1
SFX 2326 0 Values .

SFX 2327 N 1
SFX 2327 0 Variable .

SFX 2328 N 1
SFX 2328 0 VariableCanonicalUnit .

SFX 2329 N 1
SFX 2329 0 VariableDimensions .

SFX 2330 N 1
SFX 2330 0 VariableIdentifier .

SFX 2331 N 1
SFX 2331 0 VariablePhysicalQuantity .

SFX 2332 N 1
SFX 2332 0 Variances .

SFX 2333 N 1
SFX 2333 0 Variate .

SFX 2334 N 1
SFX 2334 0 Variations .

SFX 2335 N 1
SFX 2335 0 Vector .

SFX 2336 N 1
SFX 2336 0 VectorBar .

SFX 2337 N 1
SFX 2337 0 VectorField .

SFX 2338 N 1
SFX 2338 0 VertexCover .

SFX 2339 N 1
SFX 2339 0 VertexCut .

SFX 2340 N 1
SFX 2340 0 VertexIndependentPaths .

SFX 2341 N 1
SFX 2341 0 Vertices .

SFX 2342 N 1
SFX 2342 0 View .

SFX 2343 N 1
SFX 2343 0 ViewBox .

SFX 2344 N 1
SFX 2344 0 ViewBoxOptions .

SFX 2345 N 1
SFX 2345 0 Violet .

SFX 2346 N 1
SFX 2346 0 VioletRed .

SFX 2347 N 1
SFX 2347 0 volt .

SFX 2348 N 1
SFX 2348 0 volts .

SFX 2349 N 1
SFX 2349 0 von .

SFX 2350 N 1
SFX 2350 0 vons .

SFX 2351 N 1
SFX 2351 0 W .

SFX 2352 N 1
SFX 2352 0 WaitAll .

SFX 2353 N 1
SFX 2353 0 WaitNext .

SFX 2354 N 1
SFX 2354 0 WalkProcess .

SFX 2355 N 1
SFX 2355 0 wan .

SFX 2356 N 1
SFX 2356 0 wans .

SFX 2357 N 1
SFX 2357 0 Warning .

SFX 2358 N 1
SFX 2358 0 watt .

SFX 2359 N 1
SFX 2359 0 watts .

SFX 2360 N 1
SFX 2360 0 Wave .

SFX 2361 N 1
SFX 2361 0 Wavelet .

SFX 2362 N 1
SFX 2362 0 WaveletTransform .

SFX 2363 N 1
SFX 2363 0 weber .

SFX 2364 N 1
SFX 2364 0 webers .

SFX 2365 N 1
SFX 2365 0 WeierstrassP .

SFX 2366 N 1
SFX 2366 0 Weight .

SFX 2367 N 1
SFX 2367 0 While .

SFX 2368 N 1
SFX 2368 0 WhiskerChart .

SFX 2369 N 1
SFX 2369 0 White .

SFX 2370 N 1
SFX 2370 0 Width .

SFX 2371 N 1
SFX 2371 0 Widths .

SFX 2372 N 1
SFX 2372 0 Window .

SFX 2373 N 1
SFX 2373 0 wiseLayer .

SFX 2374 N 1
SFX 2374 0 WishartMatrixDistribution .

SFX 2375 N 1
SFX 2375 0 WithContents .

SFX 2376 N 1
SFX 2376 0 Within .

SFX 2377 N 1
SFX 2377 0 WithinQ .

SFX 2378 N 1
SFX 2378 0 Word .

SFX 2379 N 1
SFX 2379 0 WordLength .

SFX 2380 N 1
SFX 2380 0 Wrapper .

SFX 2381 N 1
SFX 2381 0 WrapperBox .

SFX 2382 N 1
SFX 2382 0 WrapperBoxOptions .

SFX 2383 N 1
SFX 2383 0 Write .

SFX 2384 N 1
SFX 2384 0 WriteBinary .

SFX 2385 N 1
SFX 2385 0 x .

SFX 2386 N 1
SFX 2386 0 xanthin .

SFX 2387 N 1
SFX 2387 0 xp .

SFX 2388 N 1
SFX 2388 0 xpPrime .

SFX 2389 N 1
SFX 2389 0 XYZ .

SFX 2390 N 1
SFX 2390 0 y .

SFX 2391 N 1
SFX 2391 0 Y .

SFX 2392 N 1
SFX 2392 0 yakis .

SFX 2393 N 1
SFX 2393 0 yard .
