Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
BlomqvistBeta/2199
boisseau/2385
ChineseRemainder/2214
ColorQ/2296
config/2316
Connes/2372
Cyan/2369
Daubechies/2361
dieb/2320
Dini/2294
DOS/2203
EllipticE/2387,2388
Flat/2187,2188,2189,2265
frac/2231
GoodmanKruskalGamma/2199
Haar/2361
HoeffdingD/2199
Hotelling/2286
Indeterminate/2221
Interactive/2273
KendallTau/2199
Kuiper/1994,2199
Lanczos/2372
Length/2367
Ligh/2173,2174,2175,2176,2177,2178,2179,2190,2208,2209,2210,2240,2241
ListPlot/9,2337
Magnify/2252
molec/2299
Multilaunch/2357
NDSolve/2324
Neumann/2324
Neville/2216,2217,2218,2219
Nuttall/2372
Ornstein/2298
ParametricNDSolve/2324
Parzen/2372
Pillai/2270,2271
PolynomialQ/2307,2308
polys/2225,2229
RegressionReport/2326
Rolle/2287
Sackur/2200
septillion/2211
Series/470,578,2195
sextillion/2211
Siegel/2215,2289
Skeleton/2274
spatio/2185
Speak/2206
Swart/2268
tonneau/2385
unar/2390
Unix/2232
unknot/2240
Wada/2223
WilksW/2199
